Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 4. Private Security Services Businesses.

§ 9.1-138.
Definitions.

In addition to the definitions set forth in §

9.1-101

, as used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Alarm respondent”
means an individual who responds to the signal of an alarm for the purpose of detecting an intrusion of the home, business or property of the end user.

“Armed”
means a private security registrant who carries or has immediate access to a firearm in the performance of his duties.

“Armed security officer”
means a natural person employed to (i) safeguard and protect persons and property or (ii) deter theft, loss, or concealment of any tangible or intangible personal property on the premises he is contracted to protect, and who carries or has access to a firearm in the performance of his duties.

“Armored car personnel”
means persons who transport or offer to transport under armed security from one place to another, money, negotiable instruments or other valuables in a specially equipped motor vehicle with a high degree of security and certainty of delivery.

“Business advertising material”
means display advertisements in telephone directories, letterhead, business cards, local newspaper advertising, contracts, and any electronic medium, including the Internet, social media, and digital advertising.

“Central station dispatcher”
means an individual who monitors burglar alarm signal devices, burglar alarms or any other electrical, mechanical or electronic device used (i) to prevent or detect burglary, theft, shoplifting, pilferage or similar losses; (ii) to prevent or detect intrusion; or (iii) primarily to summon aid for other emergencies.

“Certification”
means the method of regulation indicating that qualified persons have met the minimum requirements as private security services training schools, private security services instructors, compliance agents, or certified detector canine handler examiners.

“Compliance agent”
means an individual who owns or is employed by a licensed private security services business to ensure the compliance of the private security services business with this title.

“Computer or digital forensic services”
means the use of highly specialized expertise for the recovery, authentication, and analysis of electronic data or computer usage.

“Courier”
means any armed person who transports or offers to transport from one place to another documents or other papers, negotiable or nonnegotiable instruments, or other small items of value that require expeditious services.

“Detector canine”
means any dog that detects drugs or explosives.

“Detector canine handler”
means any individual who uses a detector canine in the performance of private security duties.

“Detector canine handler examiner”
means any individual who examines the proficiency and reliability of detector canines and detector canine handlers in the detection of drugs or explosives.

“Detector canine team”
means the detector canine handler and his detector canine performing private security duties.

“Electronic security business”
means any person who engages in the business of or undertakes to (i) install, service, maintain, design or consult in the design of any electronic security equipment to an end user; (ii) respond to or cause a response to electronic security equipment for an end user; or (iii) have access to confidential information concerning the design, extent, status, password, contact list, or location of an end user’s electronic security equipment.

“Electronic security employee”
means an individual who is employed by an electronic security business in any capacity which may give him access to information concerning the design, extent, status, password, contact list, or location of an end user’s electronic security equipment.

“Electronic security equipment”
means (i) electronic or mechanical alarm signaling devices including burglar alarms or holdup alarms used to safeguard and protect persons and property; or (ii) cameras used to detect intrusions, concealment or theft, to safeguard and protect persons and property. This shall not include tags, labels, and other devices that are attached or affixed to items offered for sale, library books, and other protected articles as part of an electronic article surveillance and theft detection and deterrence system.

“Electronic security sales representative”
means an individual who sells electronic security equipment on behalf of an electronic security business to the end user.

“Electronic security technician”
means an individual who installs, services, maintains or repairs electronic security equipment.

“Electronic security technician’s assistant”
means an individual who works as a laborer under the supervision of the electronic security technician in the course of his normal duties, but who may not make connections to any electronic security equipment.

“Employed”
means to be in an employer/employee relationship where the employee is providing work in exchange for compensation and the employer directly controls the employee’s conduct and pays some taxes on behalf of the employee. The term “employed” shall not be construed to include independent contractors.

“End user”
means any person who purchases or leases electronic security equipment for use in that person’s home or business.

“Firearms training verification”
means the verification of successful completion of either initial or retraining requirements for handgun or shotgun training, or both.

“General public”
means individuals who have access to areas open to all and not restricted to any particular class of the community.

“Key cutting”
means making duplicate keys from an existing key and includes no other locksmith services.

“License number”
means the official number issued to a private security services business licensed by the Department.

“Locksmith”
means any individual that performs locksmith services, or advertises or represents to the general public that the individual is a locksmith even if the specific term locksmith is substituted with any other term by which a reasonable person could construe that the individual possesses special skills relating to locks or locking devices, including use of the words lock technician, lockman, safe technician, safeman, boxman, unlocking technician, lock installer, lock opener, physical security technician or similar descriptions.

“Locksmith services”
mean selling, servicing, rebuilding, repairing, rekeying, repinning, changing the combination to an electronic or mechanical locking device; programming either keys to a device or the device to accept electronic controlled keys; originating keys for locks or copying keys; adjusting or installing locks or deadbolts, mechanical or electronic locking devices, egress control devices, safes, and vaults; opening, defeating or bypassing locks or latching mechanisms in a manner other than intended by the manufacturer; with or without compensation for the general public or on property not his own nor under his own control or authority.

“Natural person”
means an individual person.

“Personal protection specialist”
means any individual who engages in the duties of providing close protection from bodily harm to any person.

“Private investigator”
means any individual who engages in the business of, or accepts employment to make, investigations to obtain information on (i) crimes or civil wrongs; (ii) the location, disposition, or recovery of stolen property; (iii) the cause of accidents, fires, damages, or injuries to persons or to property; or (iv) evidence to be used before any court, board, officer, or investigative committee.

“Private security services business”
means any person engaged in the business of providing, or who undertakes to provide, armored car personnel, security officers, personal protection specialists, private investigators, couriers, security canine handlers, security canine teams, detector canine handlers, detector canine teams, alarm respondents, locksmiths, central station dispatchers, electronic security employees, electronic security sales representatives or electronic security technicians and their assistants to another person under contract, express or implied.

“Private security services instructor”
means any individual certified by the Department to provide mandated instruction in private security subjects for a certified private security services training school.

“Private security services registrant”
means any qualified individual who has met the requirements under this article to perform the duties of alarm respondent, locksmith, armored car personnel, central station dispatcher, courier, electronic security sales representative, electronic security technician, electronic security technician’s assistant, personal protection specialist, private investigator, security canine handler, detector canine handler, unarmed security officer or armed security officer.

“Private security services training school”
means any person certified by the Department to provide instruction in private security subjects for the training of private security services business personnel in accordance with this article.

“Registration”
means a method of regulation whereby certain personnel employed by a private security services business are required to register with the Department pursuant to this article.

“Registration category”
means any one of the following categories: (i) unarmed security officer and armed security officer/courier, (ii) security canine handler, (iii) armored car personnel, (iv) private investigator, (v) personal protection specialist, (vi) alarm respondent, (vii) central station dispatcher, (viii) electronic security sales representative, (ix) electronic security technician, (x) electronic technician’s assistant, (xi) detector canine handler, or (xii) locksmith.

“Security canine”
means a dog that has attended, completed, and been certified as a security canine by a certified security canine handler instructor in accordance with approved Department procedures and certification guidelines. “Security canines” shall not include detector dogs.

“Security canine handler”
means any individual who utilizes his security canine in the performance of private security duties.

“Security canine team”
means the security canine handler and his security canine performing private security duties.

“Supervisor”
means any individual who directly or indirectly supervises registered or certified private security services business personnel.

“Unarmed security officer”
means a natural person who performs the functions of observation, detection, reporting, or notification of appropriate authorities or designated agents regarding persons or property on the premises he is contracted to protect, and who does not carry or have access to a firearm in the performance of his duties.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.27; 1977, c. 376, §

54.1-1900

; 1980, c. 425, cc. 57, 779; 1988, c. 765; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.1; 1994, cc. 45, 335, 810; 1995, c. 79; 1996, c. 541; 1997, c. 80; 1998, cc. 122, 807; 1999, c. 33; 2001, cc. 821, 844; 2003, c. 124; 2004, c. 470; 2005, c. 365; 2008, c. 638; 2009, c. 375; 2011, c. 263; 2017, c. 85.

Cross references.

As to exclusions under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act pertaining to records of active investigations being conducted by the Department of Criminal Justice Services pursuant to this article, see §

2.2-3705.3

.

As to exclusions for persons licensed under this Article as a private security services business from certain licensing requirements of §

54.1-1100

et seq., see §

54.1-1103

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 821 amended former § 9-183.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 821 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendment by c. 821 inserted paragraphs defining the terms “Employed,” “General Public,” and “Natural Person.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 2, provides: “That the Criminal Justice Services Board shall adopt reasonable regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 3, provides: “That, in addition to the requirements of §§

2.2-4007.01

and

2.2-4007.02

, during the promulgation of regulations in accordance with the second enactment of this act, the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall meet with representatives of the various locksmith organizations and other interested parties to solicit input from such organizations and persons in the formation and development of regulations concerning (i) the appropriate educational and training requirements for locksmiths and (ii) the Department’s investigation of complaints against its locksmith regulants, including the process by which anonymous complaints will be handled by the Department pursuant to the requirements of Article 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2. For the purposes of clause (i), the educational and training requirements, to the extent practicable, shall not exceed such requirements for electronic security businesses.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 4, provides: “That the Board of Criminal Justice Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective by July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 5, provides: “That the registration requirements of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2008. Applicants for licensing and registration for locksmiths may submit an application to the Department on or after July 1, 2008.”
At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, amendments to subsection C of §

9.1-139

have been set out as effective October 1, 2008.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 124 rewrote the definition of “Armed security officer”; in the definition of “Certification,” inserted “or” following “instructors,” and deleted “unarmed security officers, electronic security employees, or electronic security technician’s assistants” at the end; in the definition of “Electronic security equipment,” added “to safeguard and protect persons and property” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “This” for “However, ‘Electronic security equipment”’ at the beginning of the second sentence; in the definition of “Private security services registrant,” inserted “electronic security technician’s assistant” and “unarmed security officer”; added the definition of “Registration category”; deleted the definition of “Security officer,” which read: “‘Security officer’ means any individual employed by a private security services business to (i) safeguard and protect persons and property or (ii) prevent theft, loss, or concealment of any tangible or intangible personal property on the premises contracted to protect”; and rewrote the definition of “Unarmed security officer.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 470, in the definition of “Certification,” deleted “or” following “instructors” and added “or certified detector canine handler examiners” at the end; added the definitions of “Detector canine,” “Detector canine handler,” “Detector canine handler examiner,” and “Detector canine team”; inserted “detector canine handlers, detector canine teams” near the middle in the definition of “Private security services business”; inserted “detector canine handler” near the end in the definition of “Private security services registrant”; and in the definition of “Registration category,” deleted “or” at the end of clause (ix), added “or” at the end of clause (x), and added clause (xi).

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 365, in the first sentence of the definition of “Electronic security equipment,” inserted the clause (i) and (ii) designations and “used to safeguard and protect persons and property” and made a related change.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 638 added definitions for “Key cutting,” “Locksmith,” and “Locksmith services”; inserted “locksmiths” in the definition for “Private security services business”; inserted “locksmith” in the definition for “Private security services registrant”; added category (xii) in the definition for “Registration category” and made a related change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 375 deleted “or both drugs and explosives” following “explosives” in the definitions of “Detector canine” and “Detector canine handler examiner.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 263 added the definition for “Computer or digital forensic services.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 85 added “and any electronic medium, including the Internet, social media, and digital advertising” and made related changes in the definition for “Business advertising material.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Licenses, § 23.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Licensing requirement. —

When an employee installing wiring or equipment used to support electronic security equipment has access to “confidential information concerning the design, extent, status . . . or location of an end user’s electronic security equipment,” the contractor or subcontractor employing this individual must obtain a license from the Department of Criminal Justice Services as required by §

9.1-138

, et seq. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William K. Barlow, Member, House of Delegates, 10-115, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/25/11).

No distinction is made between contractors and subcontractors under the statute, only whether the individual performing the work has access to confidential information concerning the “end user’s electronic security equipment.” See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William K. Barlow, Member, House of Delegates, 10-115, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/25/11).

A business that provides wiring and data services that might be used by others, such as licensed alarm companies, to support security equipment, would not necessarily trigger the licensing equipment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William K. Barlow, Member, House of Delegates, 10-115, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/25/11).

§ 9.1-139.
Licensing, certification, and registration required; qualifications; temporary licenses.

No person shall engage in the private security services business or solicit private security business in the Commonwealth without having obtained a license from the Department. No person shall be issued a private security services business license until a compliance agent is designated in writing on forms provided by the Department. The compliance agent shall ensure the compliance of the private security services business with this article and shall meet the qualifications and perform the duties required by the regulations adopted by the Board.

No person shall act as a private security services training school or solicit students for private security training in the Commonwealth without being certified by the Department. No person shall be issued a private security services training school certification until a school director is designated in writing on forms provided by the Department. The school director shall ensure the compliance of the school with the provisions of this article and shall meet the qualifications and perform the duties required by the regulations adopted by the Board.

No person shall be employed by a licensed private security services business in the Commonwealth as armored car personnel, courier, armed security officer, detector canine handler, unarmed security officer, security canine handler, private investigator, personal protection specialist, alarm respondent, locksmith, central station dispatcher, electronic security sales representative, electronic security technician’s assistant, or electronic security technician without possessing a valid registration issued by the Department, except as provided in this article. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a licensed private security services business may hire as an independent contractor a personal protection specialist or private investigator who has been issued a registration by the Department.

A temporary license may be issued in accordance with Board regulations for the purpose of awaiting the results of the state and national fingerprint search. However, no person shall be issued a temporary license until (i) he has designated a compliance agent who has complied with the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board pursuant to subsection A of §

9.1-141

for compliance agents, (ii) each principal of the business has submitted his fingerprints for a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search, and (iii) he has met all other requirements of this article and Board regulations.

No person shall be employed by a licensed private security services business in the Commonwealth unless such person is certified or registered in accordance with this chapter.

A temporary registration may be issued in accordance with Board regulations for the purpose of awaiting the results of the state and national fingerprint search. However, no person shall be issued a temporary registration until he has (i) complied with, or been exempted from the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board, pursuant to subsection A of §

9.1-141

, for armored car personnel, couriers, armed security officers, detector canine handlers, unarmed security officers, security canine handlers, private investigators, personal protection specialists, alarm respondents, locksmith, central station dispatchers, electronic security sales representatives, electronic security technician’s assistants, or electronic security technicians, (ii) submitted his fingerprints to be used for the conduct of a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search, and (iii) met all other requirements of this article and Board regulations.

A temporary certification as a private security instructor or private security training school may be issued in accordance with Board regulations for the purpose of awaiting the results of the state and national fingerprint search. However, no person shall be issued a temporary certification as a private security services instructor until he has (i) met the education, training and experience requirements established by the Board and (ii) submitted his fingerprints to be used for the conduct of a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search. No person shall be issued a temporary certification as a private security services training school until (a) he has designated a training director, (b) each principal of the training school has submitted his fingerprints to be used for the conduct of a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search, and (c) he has met all other requirements of this article and Board regulations.

A licensed private security services business in the Commonwealth shall not employ as an unarmed security officer, electronic security technician’s assistant, unarmed alarm respondent, central station dispatcher, electronic security sales representative, locksmith, or electronic security technician, any person who has not complied with, or been exempted from, the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board, pursuant to subsection A of §

9.1-141

, except that such person may be so employed for not more than 90 days while completing compulsory minimum training standards.

No person shall be employed as an electronic security employee, electronic security technician’s assistant, unarmed alarm respondent, locksmith, central station dispatcher, electronic security sales representative, electronic security technician or supervisor until he has submitted his fingerprints to the Department to be used for the conduct of a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an out-of-state central station dispatcher meeting the requirements of subdivision 19 of §

9.1-140

.

The compliance agent of each licensed private security services business in the Commonwealth shall maintain documentary evidence that each private security registrant and certified employee employed by his private security services business has complied with, or been exempted from, the compulsory minimum training standards required by the Board. Before January 1, 2003, the compliance agent shall ensure that an investigation to determine suitability of each unarmed security officer employee has been conducted, except that any such unarmed security officer, upon initiating a request for such investigation under the provisions of subdivision A 11 of §

19.2-389

, may be employed for up to 30 days pending completion of such investigation. After January 1, 2003, no person shall be employed as an unarmed security officer until he has submitted his fingerprints to the Department for the conduct of a National Criminal Records search and a Virginia Criminal History Records search. Any person who was employed as an unarmed security officer prior to January 1, 2003, shall submit his fingerprints to the Department in accordance with subsection B of §

9.1-145

.

No person with a criminal conviction for a misdemeanor involving (i) moral turpitude, (ii) assault and battery, (iii) damage to real or personal property, (iv) controlled substances or imitation controlled substances as defined in Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, (v) prohibited sexual behavior as described in Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, or (vi) firearms, or any felony shall be (a) employed as a registered or certified employee by a private security services business or training school, or (b) issued a private security services registration, certification as an unarmed security officer, electronic security employee or technician’s assistant, a private security services training school or instructor certification, compliance agent certification, or a private security services business license, except that, upon written request, the Director of the Department may waive such prohibition. Any grant or denial of such waiver shall be made in writing within 30 days of receipt of the written request and shall state the reasons for such decision.

The Department may grant a temporary exemption from the requirement for licensure, certification, or registration for a period of not more than 30 days in a situation deemed an emergency by the Department.

All private security services businesses and private security services training schools in the Commonwealth shall include their license or certification number on all business advertising materials.

A licensed private security services business in the Commonwealth shall not employ as armored car personnel any person who has not complied with, or been exempted from, the compulsory minimum training standards established by the Board pursuant to subsection A of §

9.1-141

, except such person may serve as a driver of an armored car for not more than 90 days while completing compulsory minimum training standards, provided such person does not possess or have access to a firearm while serving as a driver.

History.

1976, c. 737, § 54-729.29; 1977, c. 376, § 54.1-1902; 1978, cc. 28, 428; 1984, cc. 57, 779; 1988, cc. 48, 765; 1991, c. 589; 1992, c. 578, § 9-183.3; 1994, cc. 45, 47, 810; 1995, c. 79; 1996, c. 541; 1998, cc. 53, 122, 807; 2000, c. 26; 2001, cc. 821, 844; 2002, cc. 578, 597; 2003, c. 124; 2004, c. 470; 2008, c. 638; 2015, c. 202; 2016, c. 561; 2018, c. 214.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 821 amended former § 9-183.3, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 821 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendment by c. 821, in subsection J, substituted “conviction for” for “record of,” inserted “(i)” before “moral turpitude,” inserted “(ii) assault and battery, (iii) damage to real or personal property, (iv) controlled substances or imitation controlled substances as defined in Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, (v) prohibited sexual behavior as described in Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, or (vi) firearms,” following “moral turpitude” and substituted “(a)” and “(b)” for “(i)” and “(ii).”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 2, provides: “That the Criminal Justice Services Board shall adopt reasonable regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 3, provides: “That, in addition to the requirements of §§

2.2-4007.01

and

2.2-4007.02

, during the promulgation of regulations in accordance with the second enactment of this act, the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall meet with representatives of the various locksmith organizations and other interested parties to solicit input from such organizations and persons in the formation and development of regulations concerning (i) the appropriate educational and training requirements for locksmiths and (ii) the Department’s investigation of complaints against its locksmith regulants, including the process by which anonymous complaints will be handled by the Department pursuant to the requirements of Article 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2. For the purposes of clause (i), the educational and training requirements, to the extent practicable, shall not exceed such requirements for electronic security businesses.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, cl. 4, provides: “That the Board of Criminal Justice Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective by July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, c. 638, which inserted “locksmith” in subsections C, F, H and I, in cl. 5 provides: “That the registration requirements of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2008. Applicants for licensing and registration for locksmiths may submit an application to the Department on or after July 1, 2008.” At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, amendments by this act to subsection C of this section are effective October 1, 2008.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 578 and 597 are identical, and in subsection I, divided the former first sentence into the present first and second sentences by deleting “and” following “Board” and adding “Before January 1, 2003, the compliance agent shall ensure”; added the last two sentences of subsection I; and added subsection M.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 124, in subsections C and E, inserted references to unarmed security officers and electronic security technician’s assistants; substituted “90” for “ninety” in subsections G and M; and substituted “30” for “thirty” in subsection I.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 470 inserted subsection E; redesignated former subsections E through M as present subsections F through N; and inserted “detector canine handlers” near the middle of subsection C and in clause (i) in the last sentence of subsection F.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 638 inserted “locksmith” in subsections C, F, H, and I. See Editor’s notes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 202 added the last sentence in subsection C.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 561 added the last sentence of subsection K.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 214 deleted the fourth sentence in subsection A, which formerly read “A compliance agent shall have either a minimum of (i) three years of managerial or supervisory experience in a private security services business; with a federal, state or local law-enforcement agency; or in a related field or (ii) five years of experience in a private security services business; with a federal, state or local law-enforcement agency; or in a related field.”; and made minor stylistic changes.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Unjust enrichment claim not viable where contract deemed void under statute. —

Because a contract between a security services provider and a business was found to be illegal under subsection A of §

9.1-139

, there was no basis to find an implied or quasi-contract; as a result, the business was granted summary judgment on the provider’s unjust enrichment or quantum meruit claim, in which it sought retention of money it garnished from the business’s bank account to pay for its security services. Urban Protective Servs. v. Great Latin Rests., L.L.C., 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 33 (Fairfax County Mar. 5, 2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Licensing requirement. —

When an employee installing wiring or equipment used to support electronic security equipment has access to “confidential information concerning the design, extent, status . . . or location of an end user’s electronic security equipment,” the contractor or subcontractor employing this individual must obtain a license from the Department of Criminal Justice Services as required by §

9.1-138

, et seq. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William K. Barlow, Member, House of Delegates, 10-115, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/25/11).

No distinction is made between contractors and subcontractors under the statute, only whether the individual performing the work has access to confidential information concerning the “end user’s electronic security equipment.” See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William K. Barlow, Member, House of Delegates, 10-115, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/25/11).

A business that provides wiring and data services that might be used by others, such as licensed alarm companies, to support security equipment, would not necessarily trigger the licensing equipment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William K. Barlow, Member, House of Delegates, 10-115, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (2/25/11).

Property owners’ association stopping vehicles. —

A property owners’ association may not compel a vehicle driver to stop, unless done by a local law enforcement agency or by a private security service that is properly licensed by the Department of Criminal Justice Services, and whose employees have also been appointed as conservators of the peace. To enforce traffic laws on privately owned streets, a property owners’ association may request the local law enforcement agency to do so, or the local governing body may designate the private streets as “highways” for law enforcement purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Bryce E. Reeves, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 13-106,
(8/13/14).